Nebraska, session 109, LB399.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 35-1204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
35-1204 (1) A mutual finance organization may be created by agreement
among its members pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint
Public Agency Act. The agreement shall:
(a) Have a duration of three years;
(b) Require that each member of the mutual finance organization levy the
same agreed-upon property tax rate within their boundaries for one out of the
three tax years covered by the agreement. The members need not levy such
agreed-upon property tax rate during the same year;
(c) Require that all members of the mutual finance organization levy no
more than such agreed-upon property tax rate for the remaining tax years
covered by the agreement; and
(d) Contain a statement of the agreed-upon maximum property tax rate.
(2) The property tax rates described in subsection (1) of this section
shall be levied for the purpose of jointly funding the operations of all
members of the mutual finance organization. All such property tax rates shall
exclude levies for bonded indebtedness and lease-purchase contracts in
existence on or after July 1, 1998.
(3) The changes made to this section by Laws 2020, LB1130, do not affect
eligibility for funding pursuant to the Mutual Finance Assistance Act that is
to be paid on or before May 1, 2021.
Sec. 2. Section 35-1205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
35-1205 (1) Any rural or suburban fire protection district which contains
within its boundaries (a) an assumed population of thirty thousand or more or
(b) at least sixty eighty percent of the assumed population of any one county
which is contained in whole or in part within the district residing outside the
city limits of any city of the first, primary, or metropolitan class in such
county shall receive a distribution from the Mutual Finance Assistance Fund
pursuant to section 35-1206.
(2) Any mutual finance organization which (a) has entered into an
agreement pursuant to section 35-1204 and (b) contains within the boundaries of
its members (i) an assumed population of thirty thousand or more or (ii) at
least sixty eighty percent of the assumed county population of any one county
which is contained in whole or in part within the mutual finance organization
residing outside the city limits of any city of the first, primary, or
metropolitan class in such county shall receive a distribution from the fund
pursuant to section 35-1206.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) The assumed population residing within the boundaries of a rural or
suburban fire protection district or mutual finance organization equals (i) the
estimated county population as determined based on the most recent estimates of
the United States Bureau of the Census for counties, minus (ii) the estimated
population of all cities and villages in the county as certified pursuant to
section 77-3,119, multiplied by (iii) a fraction, the numerator of which is the
valuation within the rural or suburban fire protection district or mutual
finance organization which is not within a city or village and the denominator
of which is the valuation in the county which is not contained within a city of
the first, primary, or metropolitan class, and added to (iv) the most recent
estimated population of all cities of the second class and villages in the fire
protection district or mutual finance organization as certified pursuant to
section 77-3,119;
(b) The assumed county population residing outside the city limits of any
city of the first, primary, or metropolitan class equals (i) the most recent
estimated county population as determined based on the most recent estimates of
the United States Bureau of the Census for counties minus (ii) the most recent
estimated population of all cities of the first, primary, or metropolitan class
in the county as certified pursuant to section 77-3,119;
(c) If a city or village is located in more than one county, the
population of the city or village which resides in the county is presumed to be
in proportion to the valuation of such city or village which is located in the
county; and
(d) If the district or mutual finance organization is located in more than
one county and the district or mutual finance organization meets the threshold
-1-

LB399 LB399
2025 2025
in subsection (1) or (2) of this section in only one county, the district or
mutual finance organization shall qualify for assistance under this section.
Sec. 3. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Original section 35-1205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and section 35-1204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-2-